Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299F.0135] ALCOHOL-BLENDED FUEL EQUIPMENT COMPATIBILITY. new text end new text begin (a) For equipment used in alcohol-blended fuel-dispensing systems containing more than ten percent ethanol, the fire and life safety requirements of the State Fire Code are satisfied when: new text end new text begin (1) the equipment has an Underwriters Laboratories (UL) listing or similar third-party certification for use with alcohol-blended fuels at an ethanol concentration within five percentage points of the ethanol concentration being dispensed; and new text end new text begin (2) the equipment manufacturer has provided written certification of compatibility with the specific ethanol blend being dispensed in accordance with Minnesota Rules, part 7150.0100, subpart 9, item C. new text end new text begin This paragraph applies to dispensers, hoses, nozzles, breakaway fittings, swivels, flexible connectors, dispenser emergency shutoff valves, vapor recovery systems, leak detection devices, and pumps. new text end new text begin (b) If Minnesota Rules, part 7150.0100, does not address an issue relating to alcohol-blended fuel-dispensing equipment, any applicable provision of the State Fire Code applies. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section affects fire and life safety requirements of the State Fire Code relating to electrical classification, emergency shutoff systems, impact protection, or other safety provisions not specifically related to equipment compatibility certification. new text end